Utah statutes.
48-1-44.   Foreign limited liability partnerships.
(1)  Subject to any statute regulating a specific type of business, a limited
liability  partnership registered and existing under the laws of another
state, may do business in this state if it registers with the division in
accordance with Section 48-1-42.
(2)  The internal affairs of a limited liability partnership registered and
existing under the laws of another jurisdiction is subject to and governed by
the laws of the state where the partnership is formed, including the
provisions providing for the liability of partners for debts, obligations of,
and liabilities chargeable to a partnership.
(3) (a)  The division may permit a tribal limited liability partnership to
register with the division in the same manner as a foreign limited liability
partnership formed in another state.
(b)  If a tribal limited liability partnership elects to register with the
division, for purposes of this chapter, the tribal limited liability
partnership shall be treated in the same manner as a foreign limited liability
partnership formed under the laws of another state.
